District of Columbia statutes.
34-1131

Information provided in association with a child support order.

A public utility shall provide to the organizational unit of the District government, or any successor organizational unit, that is responsible for administering or supervising the administration of the District’s State Plan under title IV, part D of the Social Security Act, approved January 4, 1975 (88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), in response to an administrative subpoena issued pursuant to § 46-229.03(a)(2), financial or other information concerning a customer that is necessary to establish, modify, or enforce a support order.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 982, ch. 150, § 8, par. 31A
as added Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 109, 48 DCR 1270
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 109 of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 109 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 109 of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).